Tennessee, session 114, HB2502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-205(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision (10):
(10) The transmitting of money from a location originating in this state to a
location outside of the United States or its territories by an entity licensed under the
Money Transmission Modernization Act, compiled in title 45, chapter 7;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-205(b), is amended by deleting
"Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary," and substituting "Except as
provided in subsection (d) and notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-205, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (d):
(d) Notwithstanding § 67-6-103 or any other law to the contrary, revenues
generated from the tax imposed by subdivision (c)(10):
(1) Must be deposited in a special account in the state general fund to be
known as the international money transmission tax fund. Revenues must be
retained in the account until such time as the revenues are unencumbered.
Revenues are unencumbered on July 1 of each year after the expiration of the
refund application period described in subdivision (d)(3);
HB2502
012314
- 1 -

(2) May be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4,
part 6 for the sole benefit of the international money transmission tax fund while
encumbered;
(3) Are subject to refund upon application made by the individual who
paid the tax imposed by subdivision (c)(10); provided, that the application must
be submitted to the department between June 1 and June 30 and include the
applicant's social security number or taxpayer identification number in addition to
proof of the taxes paid and any additional information the department may
require; and
(4) Must be allocated and distributed on July 1 of each year as follows:
(A) Twenty-five percent (25%) to the state general fund;
(B) Twenty-five percent (25%) to all counties and metropolitan
governments in this state in proportion as the population of each county
or metropolitan government bears to the aggregate population of the
state, according to the latest federal census, to be used for capital
improvement projects and infrastructure expenditures;
(C) Twenty-five percent (25%) to the K-12 education teacher
compensation fund that is hereby created in the state treasury to be:
(i) Used to provide a pool of funds for employee salary
increases or bonuses for teachers;
(ii) Allocated each August 1 to local education agencies
throughout the state in accordance with rules promulgated by the
department of education; and
- 2 - 012314

(iii) Allocated by each local education agency for salary
increases or bonuses for teachers according to the agency's
salary and compensation schedules or bonus program; and
(D) Twenty-five percent (25%) to the Tennessee peace officer
standards and training commission to provide an additional pay
supplement to law enforcement officers who, pursuant to § 38-8-111,
complete in-service training requirements and receive the corresponding
pay supplement provided by that statute.
SECTION 4. For purposes of promulgating rules and forms, this act takes effect upon
becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect
January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 012314